North Carolina, session 2025, SB195.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-43.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-43.17. Confidentiality of research data, records, and information of a proprietary
nature.certain records.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Personally identifiable information. – Any of the following information:
a. The name of a student.
b. The name of the parent or other family member of a student.
c. The address of a student or the student's family.
d. Any personal identifier for a student, including social security number,
student number, or biometric record.
e. Any indirect identifier for a student, including date of birth, place of
birth, or mother's maiden name.
f. Any other information, alone or in combination, that is linked or
linkable to a specific student and that would allow a reasonable person
in the community of the public institution of higher education where
the student attends, who does not have personal knowledge of the
relevant circumstances, to identify the student with reasonable
certainty.
g. Any information requested by a person who the public institution of
higher education reasonably believes knows the identity of the student
to whom the information relates.
(2) Personally identifiable student disciplinary records. – Any records, including
materials that are described in G.S. 132-1(a), that meet all of the following
criteria:
a. Are made, received, or maintained by a public institution of higher
education.
b. Contain personally identifiable information of or about a student.
c. Are related to a complaint, investigation, or resolution of an alleged
violation of or noncompliance with the disciplinary or conduct rules
or other policy of a public institution of higher education.
(3) Public institution of higher education. – Any of the following:
*S195-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The University of North Carolina.
b. A constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, as
defined in G.S. 116-2(4), that is an institution of higher education.
c. The Community Colleges System Office, as defined in G.S. 115D-3.
d. A community college, as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2).
(4) Student. – Any individual (i) who attends or has attended a public institution
of higher education and (ii) about whom the public institution of higher
education maintains records.
(b) Confidentiality of Certain Records. – The following are not public records under
Chapter 132 of the General Statutes:
(1) Research data, records, or information of a proprietary nature, produced or
collected by or for state institutions of higher learning in the conduct of
commercial, scientific, or technical research where the data, records, or
information has not been patented, published, or copyrighted are not public
records as defined by G.S. 132-1.copyrighted.
(2) Personally identifiable student disciplinary records, even if release of the
records would be permitted by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (34 C.F.R. Part 99). Nothing in this subdivision is
intended to limit the disclosure of public records that do not contain personally
identifiable information."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115D-78 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-78. Access to information and public records; small business counseling
information.
(a) In accordance with Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, all rules, regulations and
public records of the State Board of Community Colleges, the Community Colleges System
Office, and local boards of trustees shall be available for examination and reproduction on
payment of fees by any person.
(a1) As provided in G.S. 116-43.17, personally identifiable student disciplinary records
are not public records under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 132-1.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-1.2. Confidential information.
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require or authorize a public agency or its
subdivision to disclose any information that:
…
(11) Reveals personally identifiable student disciplinary records in violation of
G.S. 116-43.17."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to requests for
personally identifiable student disciplinary records submitted on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 195-First Edition